Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
LIMITATIONS ON
CONSUMERS' LIABILITIES

5-3-301. Restriction on liability in consumer lease.

The obligation of a lessee upon expiration of a consumer lease, may not exceed twice the average payment allocable to a monthly period under the lease. This limitation does not apply to charges for damages to the leased property or for other default.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1221, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-406, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-302. Limitation on default charges.

Except for reasonable expenses incurred in realizing on a security interest, the agreement with respect to a consumer credit transaction may not provide for charges as a result of default by the consumer other than those authorized by this code. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1221, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-414 and 5-3-405, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-303. Assignee subject to claims and defenses.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease, an assignee of the rights of the seller or lessor is subject to all claims and defenses of the buyer against the seller or lessor arising from the sale or lease of goods or services, notwithstanding that the assignee is a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument issued in connection with the consumer credit sale or consumer lease.

A claim or defense of a consumer specified in subsection (1) of this section may be asserted against the assignee under this section only to the extent of the amount owing to the assignee with respect to the sale or lease of the goods or services as to which the claim or defense arose at the time the assignee has written notice of the claim or defense.

For the purpose of determining the amount owing to the assignee with respect to the sale or lease:

Payments received by the assignee after the consolidation of two or more consumer credit sales, except pursuant to a revolving credit account, are deemed to have been first applied to the payment of the sales first made; if the sales consolidated arose from sales made on the same day, payments are deemed to have been first applied to the smallest sale; and

Payments received upon a revolving credit account are deemed to have been first applied to the payment of finance charges in the order of their entry to the account and then to the payment of debts in the order in which the entries of the debts are made to the account.

An agreement may not limit or waive the claims or defenses of a consumer under this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1221, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-403, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-304. Use of account - constructive assent to terms.

The use of a revolving credit account by a consumer, or by any person authorized by the consumer, constitutes the consumer's acceptance of the creditor's offer of credit and creates a binding contract on the creditor's terms then in effect. Such terms may be modified in the future as agreed by the parties and subject to the requirements of this article, including, but not limited to, the notice requirements of section 5-3-103.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-417 and 5-3-411, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-3-305. Advance payment to reserve lodging and motor vehicle rental services - notice to consumer required.

If a deposit, reservation fee, or other advance payment is to be charged to a revolving credit account for lodging or motor vehicle rental services to be provided in the future in this state, the seller shall not charge such advance payment to the consumer's account without first notifying the consumer, either orally or in writing, and giving the consumer the opportunity to reject the services.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-418, as it existed prior to 2000.